Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-724.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. "Sepsis" means a proven or suspected infection accompanied
by a systemic inflammatory response.
B. A hospital shall establish, implement, and periodically
update evidence-based protocols for the early identification and
treatment of patients with sepsis and septic shock.
C. The sepsis protocols shall address, at a minimum:

HB1686 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Screening patients for, and early recognition in patients
of, health-care-acquired and community-acquired sepsis and septic
shock;
2. Identification of patients for whom treatment, using the
sepsis protocols, is appropriate, and for whom treatment would be
inappropriate based on patient-specific clinical or bioethical
considerations, and documentation of these patient identification
activities;
3. Treatment guidelines;
4. Components that are population-specific as clinically
indicated in accordance with evidence-based best practices, such as
perinatal, neonatal, pediatric, and adult variations that may exist
in the identification and treatment of sepsis, with corresponding
development and use of clinical staff training materials and
practice tools that distinctly identify these population-specific
variations; and
5. Training of clinical staff in the sepsis protocols and
providing updated training upon substantive revisions thereof.
D. A hospital shall ensure that appropriate clinical staff
receive training in the sepsis protocols.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-724.2 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

HB1686 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

For purposes of the early identification and treatment of
sepsis, and for consistency with the ICD-10-CM coding classification
system utilized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, any third-party payor or managed care organization with
which the Oklahoma Health Care Authority contracts for the delivery
of Medicaid services, and any health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
shall use and apply clinical criteria for sepsis that requires no
more than:
1. A provider's diagnosis of sepsis and that a suspected or
confirmed source of infection is present; and
2. The presence of two or more symptoms indicating inflammatory
response syndrome which may include elevated values of the patient's
body temperature, heart rate, white blood count, or respiratory
rate.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2025 – DO PASS, As Coauthored.






HB1686 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.